Hawaii statutes.
§431:19-104 Minimum capital and surplus.
(a) Each captive insurance company licensed pursuant to this article shall
possess and thereafter maintain unimpaired capital and surplus in the amount
established by the commissioner; provided that:

(1) The commissioner shall take into account the
nature and volume of business transacted by each captive insurance company, and
any other factors deemed appropriate by the commissioner;

(2) Class 3 companies shall be subject to other
applicable provisions of this chapter that may require capital and surplus in
excess of those established by the commissioner; and

(3) Minimum capital and surplus established by the
commissioner shall be no less than the following amounts:

(A) Class 1 company: $100,000;

(B) Class 2 company: $250,000;

(C) Class 3 company: $500,000;

(D) Class 4 company: $500,000; and

(E) Class 5 company: An amount as determined
by the commissioner on a case by case basis.

(b) Minimum required capital and surplus
established by the commissioner pursuant to subsection (a) shall be in any one
or combination of the following forms: cash, irrevocable letter of credit
issued by a bank chartered by this State or a member bank of the Federal
Reserve System, public obligations as defined in section 431:6-301, or other
form approved by the commissioner; provided that minimum required capital and
surplus in excess of the amounts listed in subsection (a)(3) shall be allowed
to be invested in accordance with a strategic investment policy adopted and monitored
by the captive insurance company’s governing body, and approved by the
commissioner.

(c) In the case of a branch captive insurance
company, and in lieu of minimum capital and surplus under this section, the
commissioner shall determine the amount and form of security to be maintained
by the branch captive insurance company in this State after taking into
consideration:

(1) The amount and nature of risk written through and
retained by the branch captive insurance company in this State;

(2) The financial condition of the outside captive
insurance company whose branch office is located in this State;

(3) Trusts or other security posted for ceding
insurers; and

(4) Any other factors the commissioner deems
appropriate.

The security required by the commissioner may be in
the form of cash, an irrevocable letter of credit issued by a bank chartered in
this State or a member bank of the Federal Reserve System, a trust, public
obligations as defined in section 431:6-301, or any other forms of security deemed
appropriate by the commissioner. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1998, c 150,
§4; am L 1999, c 302, §3; am L 2000, c 36, §4 and c 133, §4; am L 2003, c 209,
§3; am L 2007, c 232, §6; am L 2008, c 190, §5; am L 2012, c 253, §10]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next